Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.876

[Art. 144] Presumption of jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the military courts and boards established by this code shall be presumed and the burden of proof rests on any person seeking to oust those courts or boards of jurisdiction in any action or proceeding.

[ 1963 c 220 s 129.]